Utah statutes.
61-2g-403.   Professional conduct -- Uniform standards.

(1) (a)  A person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter shall comply with:

(i)  generally accepted standards of professional appraisal practice; and

(ii)  generally accepted ethical rules to be observed by a real estate appraiser.

(b)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (1), generally accepted standards of professional appraisal practice are evidenced by the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice promulgated by the Appraisal Foundation.

(c)  After a public hearing held in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board, with the concurrence of the division:

(i)  shall adopt and may make modifications of or additions to the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice as the board considers appropriate to comply with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989; or

(ii)  may by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, exempt a person licensed, certified, or registered from complying with a provision of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice for an activity that the person engages in on behalf of a governmental entity.

(d)  When an individual is a state-licensed appraiser or state-certified appraiser and also holds a license issued under Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act, the individual may provide an opinion of price of real estate without complying with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice if the individual provides the opinion of price as a licensee under Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act.

(e)  A state-licensed or state-certified appraiser who also holds a license issued under Chapter 2c, Utah Residential Mortgage Practices and Licensing Act, or Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act, may not act under more than one license in a single transaction.

(2)  When instructed by the board, the division shall schedule a public hearing pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for the purpose of deciding whether or not the board should require a modified or supplemental standard or the ethical rule to be observed by a person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter if the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation:

(a) (i)  modifies the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;

(ii)  issues a supplemental appraisal standard which it considers appropriate for:

(A)  a residential real estate appraiser; or

(B)  a general real estate appraiser; or

(iii)  issues an ethical rule to be observed by a real estate appraiser; and

(b)  requests the board to consider the adoption of the modified or supplemental standard or ethical rule.

(3)  If, after the notice and public hearing described in Subsection (2), the board finds that a modified or supplemental standard or the ethical rule issued by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation is appropriate for a person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter, the board shall recommend a rule requiring a person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter to observe the modified or supplemental standard or the ethical rule.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2012 General Session

